Utah statutes.
20A-5-303 (Superseded 03/08/12).   Establishing, dividing, abolishing, and
changing voting precincts -- Common polling places -- Combined voting
precincts -- Counties.
(1) (a)  After receiving recommendations from the county clerk, the county
legislative body may establish, divide, abolish, and change voting precincts.
(b)  Within 30 days after the establishment, division, abolition, or change of
a voting precinct under this section, the county legislative body shall file
with the Automated Geographic Reference Center, created under Section
63F-1-506, a notice describing the action taken and specifying the resulting
boundaries of each voting precinct affected by the action.
(2) (a)  The county legislative body shall alter or divide voting precincts so
that each voting precinct contains not more than 1,250 active voters.
(b)  The county legislative body shall:
(i)  identify those precincts that may reach the limit of active voters in a
precinct under Subsection (2)(a) or that becomes too large to facilitate the
election process; and
(ii)  divide those precincts on or before January 1, of a general election
year.
(3)  The county legislative body may not:
(a)  establish or abolish any voting precinct after January 1 of a regular
general election year; or
(b)  alter or change the boundaries of any voting precinct after January 1 of
a regular general election year.
(4) (a)  For the purpose of voting in an election, the county legislative body
may establish a common polling place for two or more whole voting precincts.
(b)  At least 90 days before the election, the county legislative body shall
designate:
(i)  the voting precincts that will vote at the common polling place; and
(ii)  the location of the common polling place.
(c)  A county may use one set of election judges for the common polling place
under this Subsection (4).
(5)  Each county shall have at least two polling places open for voting on the
date of the election.
(6)  Each common polling place shall have at least one voting device that is
accessible for individuals with disabilities in accordance with Public Law
107-252, the Help America Vote Act of 2002.
